Utah statutes.
76-10-1002.   Forging or counterfeiting trademark, trade name or trade device.

Every person who willfully forges or counterfeits, or procures to be forged or counterfeited, any trademark, trade name, or trade device, usually affixed by any person, or by any association or union of workingmen, to his or its goods, which has been filed with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code, with intent to pass off any goods to which the forged or counterfeited trademark, trade name, or trade device is affixed, or intended to be affixed, as the goods of the person or association or union of workingmen, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 66, 1984 General Session

